Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
621C [OLD]

WITNESS
IMMUNITY

REPEALED. L 1978, c 212, §1.

CHAPTER
621C

WITNESS
IMMUNITY

Section

621C-1 Self-incrimination claim precluded

621C-2 Procedures

621C-3 Use immunity

621C-4 Transactional immunity

621C-5 Penalty

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next